Rhode Island, session 2025, SB671.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-15-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-15 entitled "Emergency
Management" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-15-15. Immunity from liability — Compensation for death or injury of disaster
response workers.
(a) All functions under this chapter, and all other activities relating to disaster response, are
hereby declared to be governmental functions. Neither the state, nor any political subdivision
thereof, nor other agencies of the state or political subdivision thereof, nor, except in cases of willful
misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any disaster response worker complying with, or
reasonably attempting to comply with this chapter, or any order, rule, or regulation promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to precautionary
measures enacted by any political subdivision of the state, shall be liable for the death of, or injury
to, persons, or for damage to property, as a result of disaster response activity. The provisions of
this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would
otherwise be entitled under this chapter, nor under the Workers’ Compensation Act, chapters 29 —
38 of title 28, nor under any pension law, nor the right of any person to receive any benefits or
compensation under any act of Congress.
(b) Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill
shall not apply to any authorized disaster response worker who shall, in the course of performing
his or her duties as such, practice such professional, mechanical, or other skill during a disaster

emergency.
(c) In the absence of any other benefits as provided by law, all disaster response workers
who shall be killed or sustain disability or injury while in training for or on disaster response duty
shall be construed to be employees of the state, any other provisions of the law to the contrary
notwithstanding, and shall be compensated in like manner as state employees are compensated
under the provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of title 28.
(d) In the absence of any other benefits as provided by law, any and all authorized disaster
response workers who shall, in the course of performing their duties as such, practice professional,
architecture, mechanical, engineering or other skill during a disaster emergency shall be entitled to
all rights in like manner as state employees under the provisions of chapters 29 through 38 of title
28 and under § 9-31-8.
(d)(e) As used in this section, the term “disaster response worker” shall include any full-
or part-time paid, volunteer, or auxiliary employee of this state, other states, territories, or
possessions, the District of Columbia, the federal government, any neighboring country, or any
political subdivision thereof, or any agency or organization, or any private person, firm, or
corporation performing disaster response services at any place in this state subject to the order or
control of, or pursuant to a request of, the state government or any political subdivision thereof.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000989/SUB A
========
LC000989/SUB A - Page 2 of 3